Massachusetts, session 194th, S2175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definitions:-
“Low income community”, a municipality where the median household income is 65 per
cent or less than the statewide household median income. In the case of a municipality with
50,000 residents or more, low income community shall mean a geographically contiguous,
historically recognized neighborhood of 10,000-50,000 residents.
“Minority business enterprise”, as used in this chapter shall be defined as it is in section
58 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing.
of 5

“Women business enterprise” as used in this chapter shall be defined as it is in section 58
of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing.
SECTION 2. Section 14C of said chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after subsection (h) the following subsections:-
(i) Within 150 calendar days of the effective date of this section, any entity awarded a
contract under the provisions of chapter 7, shall provide written verification with every invoice
submitted to the awarding authority detailing the portion of the payment that will be allocated to
minority business enterprises and women business enterprises, and reporting the racial, ethnic
and gender make-up of the awardees’ workforce in Massachusetts. The awardee shall take
necessary steps to prevent the disclosure of individually-identifying information about
employees on this report.
(j) The executive office of administration and finance shall, within 90 calendar days of
the effective date of this section, promulgate a template reporting form, for optional use by the
awarding authority, to assist contractors in meeting the requirements of this section.
(k) The awarding authority shall submit the report to the Massachusetts Management and
Reporting System (MMARS) within 30 calendar days of receiving it. The comptroller of the
commonwealth shall, within 120 days of the effective date of this section, develop appropriate
fields within the MMARS for receiving this data.
SECTION 3. Section 22O of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following sentence:-
of 5

The commonwealth shall seek to achieve minority business enterprise and women
business enterprise contracting goals within state procurement that reflect the diverse racial,
ethnic and gender makeup of the commonwealth’s population.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following definitions:-
“Low income community”, a municipality where the median household income is 65 per
cent or less than the statewide household median income. In the case of a municipality with
50,000 residents or more, low income community shall mean a geographically contiguous,
historically recognized neighborhood of 10,000-50,000 residents.
“Minority business enterprise”, as used in this chapter shall be defined as it is in section
58 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing.
“Women business enterprise” as used in this chapter shall be defined as it is in section 58
of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing.
SECTION 5. Section 44A of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “chapter;” in line 17 the following sentence:- provided,
however, that in deliberating upon the responsibility of a bidder, a contracting public agency
shall consider a bidder’s compliance with commitments made in previous bids or contract
documents with the commonwealth, if any, including, but not limited to, the failure of a bidder,
contractor, or proposed subcontractor to comply with the commitments regarding the
employment of minority business enterprises and women business enterprises and regarding
workforce inclusion goals.
of 5

SECTION 6. Section 44A½ of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraphs:-
(d) It shall be the goal of the commonwealth to achieve minority business enterprise and
women business enterprise contracting goals and workforce participation goals on the totality of
state-funded design and construction contracts that are reflective of the diverse racial, ethnic, and
gender make-up of the commonwealth’s population.
(e) It shall be the goal of the commonwealth that job creation on state-funded
construction contracts be targeted to members of the community in which a project is physically
located and that the workforce on that project reflect the demographic diversity of the host
community, when construction projects are located in low income communities.
SECTION 7. Paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of section 44D½ of chapter 149, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
(viii) Joint Ventures, documentation demonstrating that the firm has formed an
association of not less than 2 businesses in which 1 of the businesses is a minority business
enterprise or a women business enterprise.
SECTION 8. Paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of section 44D½ of chapter 149, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
(iii) Evidence of the bidder, contractor, or proposed contractor’s ability to advance the
commonwealth’s contracting and workforce inclusion goals as stated in section 44A½ of chapter
149.
of 5

SECTION 9. Said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 44N. Data collection and disclosure
Within 150 calendar days of the effective date of this section, any entity awarded a
contract for construction by a state agency shall provide written verification with every progress
payment request (PPR) submitted to the awarding authority detailing the portion of the payment
that will be allocated to minority business enterprises and women business enterprises
respectively, as defined in section 58 of chapter 7, and detailing the total number of hours
worked by all employees on that contract during the period covered by the PPR; and including a
breakdown of hours worked by workers’ ZIP codes of residence, as well as a breakdown of the
number of hours worked by women and workers of color, respectively. The reporting entity shall
take necessary steps to prevent the disclosure of individually-identifying information about
employees on this report.
The executive office of administration and finance shall, within 90 calendar days of the
effective date of this section, promulgate a template reporting form, for optional use by the
awarding authority, to assist contractors in meeting the requirements of this section.
The awarding authority shall submit the report to the Massachusetts Management and
Reporting System (MMARS) within 30 calendar days of receiving it. The comptroller of the
commonwealth shall, within 120 days of the effective date of this section, develop appropriate
fields within the MMARS for receiving this data.
of 5